District of Columbia statutes.
8-1533

Compostable or recyclable disposable food service ware required.

(a)

A District facility, agency, and department using disposable food service ware shall use compostable or recyclable disposable food service ware; provided, that disposable food service ware supplies already purchased as of December 17, 2014, may be used until the supplies are exhausted or until January 1, 2017, including disposable food service ware supplies that the District is obligated to purchase under any contracts in force as of December 17, 2014.

(b)

A District contractor and lessee using disposable food service ware shall use compostable or recyclable disposable food service ware; provided, that disposable food service ware supplies already purchased as of December 17, 2014, may be used until the supplies are exhausted or until January 1, 2017, including disposable food service ware supplies that the District contractor or lessee is obligated to purchase under any contracts in force on December 17, 2014.

(c)

By January 1, 2017, no food service entity shall sell or provide food or beverages, for consumption on or off premises, in disposable food service ware unless the disposable food service ware is compostable or recyclable; provided, that this subsection shall not apply to prepackaged food or beverages that were filled and sealed outside of the District before a food service entity received them.

History

Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-142, § 403, 61 DCR 8045
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 6172(c), 62 DCR 10905

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “shall use compostable or recyclable disposable food service ware” for “shall use compostable or recyclable disposable food service ware unless there is no suitable affordable or compostable or recyclable product available as determined by the Mayor in accordance with this chapter” in (a) and (b); and substituted “entity” for “business” twice in (c).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6172(c) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-142, § 502(g), see § 6172(g) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201)..

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-142: Section 502(g) of D.C. Law 20-142 provided that §§ 403 to 405 of the act shall apply upon the inclusion of their fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-142: Section 502(g) of D.C. Law 20-142, as amended by D.C. Law 21-36, § 6172(g), provided that §§ 403 and 404 of the act shall apply as of October 1, 2015.